Wisconsin, session 2025, SB699.
do enact as follows:SB699,1Section 1. 121.555 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:121.555 (1) (a) A motor vehicle transporting 9 14 or less fewer passengers in addition to the operator.SB699,2Section 2. 121.555 (1) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:121.555 (1) (b) A motor vehicle transporting 10 15 or more passengers in addition to the operator and used temporarily to provide transportation for purposes specified under s. 340.01 (56) (a) when the school board or the governing body requests the secretary of transportation to determine that an emergency exists because no regular transportation is available. The secretary of transportation shall approve or deny the request in writing. Any authorization granted under this paragraph shall specify the purpose and need for the emergency transportation service.SB699,3Section 3. 121.555 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:121.555 (2) (a) Insurance. If the vehicle is owned or leased by a school or a school bus contractor, or is a vehicle authorized under sub. (1) (b), it shall comply with s. 121.53. If the vehicle is transporting 9 14 or fewer persons in addition to the operator and is not owned or leased by a school or by a school bus contractor, it shall be insured by a policy providing property damage coverage with a limit of not less than $10,000 and bodily injury liability coverage with limits of not less than $25,000 for each person, and, subject to the limit for each person, a total limit of not less than $50,000 for each accident. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb699 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb699 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB699 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB699 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB699: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting